Hawaii statutes.
[§531B-7] Disputes. (a) Any
dispute among any of the persons listed in section 531B-4 concerning the right
of disposition or priority shall be resolved by the probate court for the
county where the decedent resided. The probate court may award the right of
disposition to the person determined by the court to be the most fit and
appropriate to carry out the right of disposition, and may make decisions
regarding the decedent's remains.

(b) The following provisions shall apply to
the court's determination under this section:

(1) If two or more persons with the same priority
class hold the right of disposition and cannot agree by majority vote regarding
the disposition of the decedent's remains, or there are any persons who claim
to have priority over any other person, any of these persons or a funeral
establishment, cemetery, mortuary, or crematory with custody of the remains may
file a petition asking the probate court to make a determination in the matter;
and

(2) In making a determination in a case where there
are two or more persons with the same priority class who cannot agree by
majority vote, the probate court may consider the following:

(A) The reasonableness and practicality of
the proposed funeral arrangements and disposition;

(B) The degree of the personal relationship
between the decedent and each of the persons claiming the right of disposition;

(C) The desires of the person or persons who
are ready, able, and willing to pay the cost of the funeral arrangements and
disposition;

(D) The convenience and needs of other
families and friends wishing to pay respects;

(E) The desires of the decedent; and

(F) The degree to which the funeral
arrangements would allow maximum participation by all wishing to pay respect.

(c) In the event of a dispute regarding the
right of disposition, a funeral establishment, cemetery, mortuary, or crematory
shall not be liable for refusing to accept the remains, to inter or otherwise
dispose of the remains of the decedent, or complete the arrangements for the
final disposition of the remains until it receives a court order or other
written agreement signed by the parties in the disagreement that the dispute
has been resolved or settled.

If the funeral establishment, cemetery,
mortuary, or crematory retains the remains for final disposition while the
parties are in disagreement, it may embalm or refrigerate and shelter the body,
or both, while awaiting the final decision of the probate court and may add the
cost of embalming or refrigeration and sheltering to the cost of final
disposition.

If a funeral establishment, cemetery, mortuary,
or crematory brings an action under this section, it may add the legal fees and
court costs associated with a petition under this section to the cost of final
disposition.

This section shall not be construed to require
or impose a duty upon a funeral establishment, cemetery, mortuary, or crematory
to bring an action under this section.

A funeral establishment, cemetery, mortuary, or
crematory and its officers, directors, managers, members, partners, or
employees may not be held criminally or civilly liable for choosing not to
bring an action under this section. [L 2013, c 17, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next